Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5776.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 7n. (1) Real estate or personal property owned and occupied by a nonprofit theater, library, educational, or scientific institutions institution incorporated under the laws of this state with the buildings and other property thereon while occupied by them the institution solely for the purposes for which the institutions were institution was incorporated is exempt from taxation the collection of taxes under this act. This subsection does not apply to the real or personal property of a public university to the extent that property is used solely to operate a data center. As used in this subsection: (a) "Data center" means a facility composed of 1 or more buildings that is designed and intended for housing, and does house, computing, storage, networking, cooling, or power infrastructure for third-party commercial data processing. (b) "Public university" means a university that receives an appropriation under section 236(2)(a) to (o) of the state school aid act of 1979, 1979 PA 94, MCL 388.1836. (2) In addition, real estate Real or personal property owned and occupied by a nonprofit organization organized under the laws of this state devoted exclusively to fostering the development of literature, music, painting, or sculpture which that substantially enhances the cultural environment of a community as a whole, is available to the general public on a regular basis, and is occupied by it the organization solely for the purposes for which the organization was incorporated is exempt from taxation the collection of taxes under this act.